District of Columbia statutes.
5-107.02a

Physical examinations and agility standards.

(a)

All sworn members of the Metropolitan Police Department shall be required to pass, at least biennially, a physical examination and a physical agility test. The physical examination shall be performed by a physician at the Police and Fire Clinic using current medical standards adopted after consultation with medical professionals within 180 days of September 30, 2004. The physical agility testing shall be based on full-duty physical performance standards adopted within 180 days of the September 30, 2004.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section within 180 days of September 30, 2004.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 203a
as added Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 702(b), 51 DCR 9406

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-631 and § 5-701.